Washington statutes.
RCW 19.06.020

Governmental agencies shall purchase goods and services—Conditions.

Any board, commission, officer, employee or other person or persons of the state, or any county, city, town, school district or other agency, political subdivision or taxing district of the state, whose duty it is to purchase materials, supplies, goods, wares, merchandise or produce, or to procure services, for the use of any department or institution within the state, shall make such purchases and procure such services whenever available, from any nonprofit agency for the blind located within the state which manufactures or distributes blind made products: PROVIDED, That the goods and services made by or offered by such agencies shall be equal in quality and price to those available from other sources.

[ 1961 c 56 s 4; 1959 c 100 s 2.]